Florida, session 2026, HB4019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) As used in this act, the term:
(a) "Emergency medical transportation services" includes,
but is not limited to, services rendered by means of air
ambulance or an emergency medical services vehicle. As used in
this paragraph, the term:
1. "Air ambulance" means a fixed-wing or rotary-wing
aircraft used for, or intended to be used for, air
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4019 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4019 2026 Legislature
transportation of sick or injured persons requiring or likely to
require medical attention during transport.
2. "Emergency medical services vehicle" means a privately
or publicly owned vehicle or vessel that is designed,
constructed, reconstructed, maintained, equipped, or operated
for, and is used or intended to be used for, land or water
transportation of sick or injured persons requiring or likely to
require medical attention during transport.
(b) "Health care provider" means:
1. A hospital licensed under chapter 395, Florida
Statutes.
2. A physician or physician assistant licensed under
chapter 458, Florida Statutes.
3. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant
licensed under chapter 459, Florida Statutes.
4. A podiatric physician licensed under chapter 461,
Florida Statutes.
5. A health maintenance organization certificated under
part I of chapter 641, Florida Statutes.
6. An ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter
395, Florida Statutes.
7. A facility the primary purpose of which is to provide
human medical diagnostic services or a facility providing
nonsurgical human medical treatment, to which facility the
patient is admitted and from which facility the patient is
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4019 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4019 2026 Legislature
discharged within the same working day, and which facility is
not part of a hospital. However, the term does not include a
facility existing for the primary purpose of performing
terminations of pregnancy or an office maintained by a physician
or dentist for the practice of medicine.
8. A professional association, partnership, corporation,
joint venture, or other association composed of the persons
described in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4. for professional
activity.
(2)(a)1. Except as specifically provided in this
subsection, compensation to a health care provider to provide
any medical services for an inmate housed in a Lake County
detention center may not exceed 110 percent of the Medicare
allowable rate if the health care provider does not have a
contract with Lake County to provide inmate medical services.
2. Compensation to a health care provider to provide
medical services for an inmate housed in a Lake County detention
center may not exceed 125 percent of the Medicare allowable rate
if the health care provider:
a. Does not have a contract with Lake County to provide
inmate medical services; and
b. Reported a negative operating margin for the previous
year to the Agency for Health Care Administration through
hospital-audited financial data.
(b) Compensation to a hospital designated as a trauma
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4019 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4019 2026 Legislature
center by the Department of Health to provide medical services
for an inmate designated as a trauma alert victim, as defined
under Florida law, must be at 175 percent of the Medicare
allowable rate if the hospital does not have a contract with
Lake County to provide inmate medical services.
(3) Compensation to an entity to provide emergency medical
transportation services for an inmate housed in a Lake County
detention center may not exceed 110 percent of the Medicare
allowable rate if the entity does not have a contract with Lake
County to provide inmate emergency medical transportation
services.
(4) This act does not apply to charges for medical
services provided at a hospital operated by Lake County.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4019 -00-er